Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-1241.08
Sections;
applicability.

Sections 37-1241.01 to 37-1241.07
shall not apply to a person operating
a motorboat or personal watercraft and participating in a regatta,
race, marine parade, tournament, or exhibition which has been authorized or
permitted by the commission pursuant to sections 37-1262 and 37-1263 or to a person who is otherwise
exempt from the State Boat Act.

Laws 1999, LB 176, § 109;

Laws 2009, LB105, § 37;

Laws 2011, LB105, § 2.